Utah statutes.
73-4-17.   Certified copy of final judgment -- Filing.

Within 30 days after the entry of final judgment of the district court, or if an appeal is taken from a district court judgment, within 30 days after the final judgment on remittitur is entered, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the district court to deliver to the state engineer a certified copy of such judgment and to cause a certified copy thereof to be filed with the county recorder of each county in which the water adjudicated is diverted from its natural source and of each county where the water is applied.  No filing fee shall be charged by either the state engineer or the county recorder.

